Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
Penalties

175.990.
Penalty.

Any person who
uses any turnpike project and fails or refuses to pay the toll provided
therefor shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred
dollars ($100) or by imprisonment for not more than thirty (30) days,
or both, and in addition thereto the authority or the department,
whichever has the right to collect such toll, shall have a lien upon
the vehicle driven by such person for the amount of such toll and
may take and retain possession thereof until the amount of such toll
and all charges and penalties in connection therewith shall have been
paid.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 173, § 18, effective March 25, 1960.